trunk/apertium-swe-dan/dev/tomerge-apertium-swe-dan.dan.dix
<pardef n="cp-both\e\S__case" c="cp-L and cp-R. Analyse only -e- in compounds, generate -e- if cp-L">
   <e r="RL"><p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>e-</l>        <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cp-both\s\S__case" c="cp-L and cp-R. Analyse only -s- in compounds, generate -s- if cp-L">
   <e r="RL"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>s-</l>        <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="gen"/><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cp-both\s\'__case" c="As above, but with ' in the genitive case">
   <e r="RL"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>s-</l>        <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="gen"/><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cp-both\Ø\S__case" c="cp-L and cp-R. Analyse only -Ø- in compounds, generate -Ø- if cp-L">
   <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>-</l>         <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>s-</l>        <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="gen"/><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cp-both\Ø\'__case" c="As above, but with ' in the genitive case">
   <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="cmp"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>-</l>         <r><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="gen"/><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Punctuation -->

<pardef n="numeros">
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?(%)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>

  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>DKK</l><r><b/>DKK<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>EUR</l><r><b/>EUR<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kr</l><r><b/>kr<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>NOK</l><r><b/>NOK<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>rdl.</l><r><b/>rdl.<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>SEK</l><r><b/>SEK<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>tkr</l><r><b/>tkr<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>USD</l><r><b/>USD<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>ton</l><r><b/>ton<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kg</l><r><b/>kg<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>hg</l><r><b/>hg<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>g</l><r><b/>g<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>mg</l><r><b/>mg<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>km</l><r><b/>km<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>m</l><r><b/>m<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>dm</l><r><b/>dm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>cm</l><r><b/>cm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>mm</l><r><b/>mm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>har</l><r><b/>har<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>ar</l><r><b/>ar<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kvm</l><r><b/>kvm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kvcm</l><r><b/>kvcm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>MB</l><r><b/>MB<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kB</l><r><b/>kB<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>Mb</l><r><b/>Mb<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kb</l><r><b/>kb<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>MHz</l><r><b/>MHz<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kV</l><r><b/>kV<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kW</l><r><b/>kW<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kWh</l><r><b/>kWh<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>MW</l><r><b/>MW<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>hk</l><r><b/>hk<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kcal</l><r><b/>kcal<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>km/h</l><r><b/>km/h<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kp</l><r><b/>kp<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>m/s</l><r><b/>m/s<s n="num"/></r></p></e> 
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>N</l><r><b/>N<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>Nm</l><r><b/>Nm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>krydderimål</l><r><b/>krydderimål<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>spsk.</l><r><b/>spsk./h<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>tsk.</l><r><b/>tsk.<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

<!-- senere
  <e>       <re>[1-9]+([0-9]+)?(%)?</re><p><l>-årige</l><r>-årige<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[MCDXVLI]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
-->
</pardef>

<pardef n="separa">
  <e>       <re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="coma">
  <e>       <re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="paresq">
  <e>       <re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pardret">
  <e>       <re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


    <!-- Numerals -->

<pardef n="en__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="et__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="to__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


    <!-- Adjectives -->

<e lm="en">              <i>en</i><par n="en__num"/></e>
<e lm="et">              <i>et</i><par n="et__num"/></e>
<e lm="fem">             <i>fem</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="fire">            <i>fire</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="ni">              <i>ni</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="otte">            <i>otte</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="seks">            <i>seks</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="syv">             <i>syv</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="ti">              <i>ti</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="to">              <i>to</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="tre">             <i>tre</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="atten">           <i>atten</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="attende">         <i>attende</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="elleve">          <i>elleve</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="halvtreds">       <i>halvtreds</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="femten">          <i>femten</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="fjorten">         <i>fjorten</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="fjortende">       <i>fjortende</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="fyrre">           <i>fyrre</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="fyrretyvende">    <i>fyrretyvende</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="hundrede">        <i>hundrede</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="halvfems">        <i>halvfems</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="nitten">          <i>nitten</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="nul">             <i>nul</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="tres">            <i>tres</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="seksten">         <i>seksten</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="halvfjerds">      <i>halvfjerds</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="sytten">          <i>sytten</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="tolv">            <i>tolv</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="tredive">         <i>tredive</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="tretten">         <i>tretten</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="tredivte">        <i>tredivte</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="tusinde">         <i>tusinde</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="million">         <i>million</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="millionte">       <i>millionte</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="halvtredsindstyvende"><i>halvtredsindstyvende</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="halvfemsindstyvende"><i>halvfemsindstyvende</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="tresindstyvende"> <i>tresindstyvende</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e lm="halvfjerdsindstyvende"><i>halvfjerdsindstyvende</i><par n="to__num"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="separa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="numeros"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="coma"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="paresq"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="pardret"/></e>
